Indiana, session 2026, HB1146.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-54 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 54. Property Tax Liability Freeze on Homesteads
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "homestead" has the meaning set
forth in IC 6-1.1-12-37.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "property tax liability" means
liability for the tax imposed on property under this article
determined after application of all credits and deductions under
this article. The term does not include any interest or penalty
imposed under this article.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "qualified interest" refers to an
interest described in IC 6-1.1-12-37(a)(2)(B).
Sec. 4. (a) Beginning with property taxes first due and payable
in the 2027 calendar year, and for property taxes first due and
payable in each subsequent calendar year, an individual is entitled
to a determination of property tax liability with respect to the
2026 IN 1146—LS 6617/DI 125


individual's homestead under this chapter.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), the property tax
liability of an individual for property taxes first due and payable
in a particular calendar year with respect to the individual's
homestead is equal to the following amount:
(1) In the case of a homestead in which the individual
acquired a qualified interest before January 1, 2026, the
amount of property tax liability attributable to the homestead
for property taxes first due and payable in the 2026 calendar
year.
(2) In the case of a homestead in which the individual
acquired a qualified interest after December 31, 2025, the
lesser of the:
(A) amount of property tax liability attributable to the
homestead for the assessment date in the calendar year in
which the individual acquired a qualified interest in the
homestead; or
(B) lowest amount of property tax liability attributable to
the homestead for property taxes first due and payable in
a calendar year that is after the calendar year in which the
individual acquired a qualified interest in the homestead.
(c) If a physical change to the homestead results in an increased
assessment of the homestead for an assessment date after the date
on which an individual acquires a qualified interest in the
homestead, the property tax liability of an individual for property
taxes first due and payable in subsequent calendar years with
respect to the homestead is the sum of the:
(1) amount of the individual's property tax liability
attributable to the homestead otherwise determined under
subsection (b) for the calendar year; plus
(2) amount of the individual's property tax liability that is
directly attributable to the physical change in the homestead
for property taxes first due and payable in the first calendar
year for which the new assessment would otherwise result in
increased property tax liability with respect to the homestead
if not for the application of this chapter.
(d) The property tax liability for a homestead determined under
this section for property taxes first due and payable in a calendar
year is considered for all purposes to be property taxes imposed by
the state or a political subdivision in which the homestead is
located.
Sec. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, the property tax liability
2026 IN 1146—LS 6617/DI 125


determined under this chapter for a homestead for property taxes
first due and payable in a calendar year is the only property tax
liability to which the homestead is subject for that year.
Sec. 6. The auditor of the county shall apply the provisions of
this chapter to a determination of property tax liability for an
individual's homestead as set forth under this chapter.
SECTION 2. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) IC 6-1.1-54, as
added by this act, applies to property taxes first due and payable
beginning in calendar years after December 31, 2026.
(b) This SECTION expires January 1, 2029.
2026 IN 1146—LS 6617/DI 125